Texas, session 892, HB256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Title 7, Government Code, is amended by adding Chapter 796 to read as follows: CHAPTER 796. SEVERE WEATHER ADAPTATION PLAN Sec. 796.001.  PARTICIPATING ENTITIES. Not later than September 1 of each even-numbered year, each of the following entities shall publish a severe weather adaptation plan to assess the entity's role with respect to severe weather events: (1)  the Department of Agriculture; (2)  the Department of Public Safety of the State of Texas; (3)  the General Land Office; (4)  the Health and Human Services Commission; (5)  the office of the comptroller; (6)  the Parks and Wildlife Department; (7)  the Public Utility Commission of Texas; (8)  the Texas A&M Forest Service; (9)  the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality; (10)  the Texas Department of Housing and Community Affairs; (11)  the Texas Department of Insurance; (12)  the Texas Department of Transportation; and (13)  the Texas Division of Emergency Management. Sec. 796.002.  PLAN. For purposes of this chapter, a severe weather adaptation plan is a strategy to identify, minimize, and adequately prepare for the effects of severe weather and to manage the risks associated with severe weather. A plan under this section must be based on current research-based science that identifies the likely effects on this state from severe weather events. Sec. 796.003.  CONTENTS OF PLAN. (a) An entity's severe weather adaptation plan must include: (1)  a severe weather vulnerability assessment; (2)  a review of existing programs in the context of severe weather events; (3)  an analysis of the effects the entity's efforts to adapt to severe weather events would have on the entity's budget during the next 2, 5, and 10 years; (4)  potential sources of funding to support the entity's efforts to adapt to severe weather events; and (5)  a statewide strategy to monitor the continuing effects of severe weather events. (b)  In developing a severe weather adaptation plan, each entity subject to this chapter may consult with the Office of the Texas State Climatologist in the Department of Atmospheric Sciences, College of Arts and Sciences, Texas A&M University. (c)  An entity subject to this chapter that is required to develop a continuity of operations plan under Section 412.054, Labor Code, shall include in the plan the severe weather vulnerability assessment described by Subsection (a)(1). Sec. 796.004.  POSTING OF PLAN. (a) Not later than September 1 of each even-numbered year, each entity subject to this chapter shall post the entity's severe weather adaptation plan on a publicly accessible Internet website and electronically submit a copy of the plan to: (1)  the governor, lieutenant governor, and speaker of the house of representatives; (2)  the presiding officer of each standing committee or subcommittee of the legislature with primary jurisdiction over environmental matters; and (3)  the executive director of the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality. (b)  An entity shall redact from the severe weather adaptation plan information the release of which might compromise the security of the entity's operations before posting the plan on a publicly accessible Internet website. Sec. 796.005.  AUDIT OF PLAN. A severe weather adaptation plan is subject to audit by the state auditor in accordance with Chapter 321. SECTION 2.  Section 796.003(c), Government Code, as added by this Act, applies only to a continuity of operations plan developed or adopted under Section 412.054, Labor Code, on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.